Washington statutes.
RCW 43.371.080

Cost, performance, and effectiveness of database and performance of lead organization—Reports to the legislature.

(1) The authority shall report every two years to the appropriate committees of the legislature regarding the cost, performance, and effectiveness of the database and the performance of the lead organization under its contract with the authority. Using independent economic expertise, subject to appropriation, the report must evaluate whether the database has advanced the goals set forth in RCW 43.371.020(1), as well as the performance of the lead organization. The report must also make recommendations regarding but not limited to how the database can be improved, whether the contract for the lead organization should be modified, renewed, or terminated, and the impact the database has had on competition between and among providers, purchasers, and payers.

(2) The authority shall annually report to the appropriate committees of the legislature regarding any additional grants received or extended.

[ 2019 c 319 s 8; 2015 c 246 s 8.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2019 c 319: See note following RCW 43.371.020.